Arkansas, session 2025, HB1496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1004(b) and (c), concerning
requirements to renew a teaching license and licensure exceptions, are
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) To renew a teaching license, a teacher shall participate in
continuing education and professional development:
(A) Based on the teacher's evaluation and professional
growth plan under the Teacher Excellence and Support System, § 6-17-2801 et
seq.;
(B) As required under § 6-17-704 and other laws; and
(C)(B) As required by rule of the state board.
(2)(A) For purposes of the requirement for continuing education
and professional development under the Standards for Accreditation of
Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts, five (5) hours of credit for
professional development shall be given for each one (1) hour of college
credit for a graduate-level course if the college credit is:
(i) Related to and enhances the teacher's knowledge
*TNL186*
02/14/2025 1:41:56 PM TNL186

HB1496
of the subject area in which the teacher is currently teaching;
(ii) Part of the requirements for the teacher to
obtain additional licensure in a subject matter that has been designated by
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education as having a critical
shortage of teachers; or
(iii) Otherwise approved by the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section as a graduate-level course eligible for professional development
credit.
(B)(i) Credit for professional development obtained under
subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section may be allocated as follows:
(a) Up to fifteen (15) hours may be credited
to the professional development requirements for licensure; and
(b) Hours obtained in excess of fifteen (15)
may be credited to any remaining requirements for professional development
generally, if approved by the school district in a professional development
plan.
(ii) The allocation of credit for professional
development claimed under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be
approved by the:
(a) School district or open-enrollment public
charter school employing the teacher; or
(b) Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education, if the educator is not employed by a school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school.
(C) For purposes of the requirement for continuing
education and professional development under this section, each hour of
training received by licensed personnel related to teaching an advanced
placement class for a subject covered by the College Board and Educational
Testing Service shall be counted as professional development up to a maximum
of thirty (30) hours.
(3)(2) However, nothing Nothing in subdivision (b)(2) of this
section this subsection (b) shall prevent or restrict a school district from
requiring additional in-service training.
(c)(1) A teacher shall not only be assigned to teach a grade level or
a subject for which he or she is not fully or provisionally licensed by the
02/14/2025 1:41:56 PM TNL186

HB1496
state unless he or she meets one (1) of the following licensure exceptions as
established by rules promulgated by the state board: or for which he or she
is on a licensure plan approved by the division.
(1)(A) An emergency teaching permit granted to a school district
for a position filled by a nonlicensed teacher who meets the Arkansas
Qualified Teacher requirements promulgated by the state board.
(B) An emergency teaching permit may be granted annually
for not more than two (2) consecutive school years;
(2) An effective teacher licensure exception granted to a school
district for a position to be filled by an Arkansas licensed educator to
teach a content area related to the educator's current licensure content
area;
(3) A technical permit issued in cooperation with the Division
of Career and Technical Education;
(4) An Aspiring Teacher permit;
(5) A licensure exception under:
(A) The District of Innovation Program, § 6-15-2801 et
seq.;
(B) The Arkansas Quality Charter Schools Act of 2013, § 6-
23-101 et seq.; or
(C) Section 6-15-103;
(6) A plan for adding an area to an existing Arkansas teaching
license while teaching in the content area to be added; or
(7) A waiver for a long-term substitute teacher granted under
subsection (d) of this section.
(2)(A) At the request of a public school district, the division
may approve an individual's licensure plan under this section.
(B) A licensure plan may be initially approved under this
section for a period not to exceed three (3) years.
(C)(i) The division may grant, upon the request of an
individual on a licensure plan, an extension of a licensure plan for up to
two (2) additional years due to an extenuating circumstance.
(ii) However, the division may grant an individual
an extension of his or her licensure plan only one (1) time.
(D) The state board may promulgate rules governing
licensure plans granted under this section.
02/14/2025 1:41:56 PM TNL186

HB1496
(E) The provisions of this subsection (c) shall not be
waived under § 6-15-103.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1004(d), concerning long-term
substitutes, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) A public school district may request the use of a long-term
substitute under this subsection (d) for a specified period not to extend
beyond the school year for which the request is made.




























02/14/2025 1:41:56 PM TNL186